Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1339HV (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 399 Section 1. Section 7A.3, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 3 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 4 Sec. 3. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 k. Establish and administer standards for state agency 7 libraries and public libraries. 8 Sec. 4. Section 8A.204, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 9 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 10 Sec. 5. Section 8A.209, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. An enrich Iowa program is established in the department 13 to provide direct state assistance to public libraries, to 14 support the open access and access plus interlibrary loan 15 programs, to provide public libraries with an incentive 16 to improve library services that are in compliance with 17 performance measures, and to reduce inequities among 18 communities in the delivery of library services based on 19 performance measures adopted by rule by the department. The 20 department shall adopt rules governing the allocation of moneys 21 appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this 22 section to provide direct state assistance to eligible public 23 libraries. A public library is eligible for moneys under 24 this subchapter if it is in compliance with the departmentâs 25 performance measures. 26